District of Columbia statutes.
7-1305.06

Prohibited psychological therapies.

No psychosurgery, convulsive therapy, experimental treatment or behavior modifications program involving aversive stimuli or deprivation of rights set forth in this subchapter shall be administered to any resident.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 506, 25 DCR 5094

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1966.
1973 Ed., § 6-1686.